Utah statutes.
53-3-234.   Driver license application -- Selective Service Registration --
Statement.
(1)  The following information for each male United States citizen or
immigrant under the age of 26 shall be electronically transmitted by the
division to the Selective Service System:
(a)  name;
(b)  address;
(c)  Social Security number; and
(d) date of birth.
(2)  Each application for any type of license to operate a motor vehicle in
this state shall contain the following statement which must be acknowledged by
the applicant:
"By submitting this application, I am consenting to registration with the
Selective Service System, if required by federal law."
(3)  Refusal to consent to the release of information to the Selective Service
System shall result in the denial of the license.
